Louisiana, session 2026, SB135.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 27:625(G)(2) and (8) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§625. State tax; levy
* * *
G. After complying with the provisions of Subsection D of this Section, each
fiscal year the state treasurer shall credit the following amounts to the following
funds:
* * *
(2) Twenty-five percent of the monies collected pursuant to Subsection B of
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-408 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 135
this Section, not to exceed twenty million dollars, shall be credited to the Louisiana
Early Childhood Education Fund established by R.S. 17:407.30.
* * *
(8) Twenty-five percent of the monies collected pursuant to Subsection B of
this Section, not to exceed twenty million dollars, shall be credited to the
Supporting Programs, Opportunities, Resources, and Teams Fund established by R.S.
17:1792.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval by the legislature or July 1, 2027, whichever is later.